North Dakota, session 69, HB1053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-01-01.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
24-01-01.2. State highway system - Mileage.
The state highway system may not exceed seven percent of the entire road mileage of the state,
whether such roads are township, county, or state roads, which may be functionally classified as to
service, and in no case may such highway system exceed seven thousand seven hundred miles
[12391.95 kilometers] in length.

H. B. NO. 1053 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1053.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State